test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-h10_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    fall+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: fall
    fall+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: fall
    fall+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: falli
    fall+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: fals
    fall+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: føll
    fall+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: føll
    fall+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: føllum
    fall+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: falla
    fall+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: fallið
    fall+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: fallið
    fall+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: fallinum
    fall+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: falsins
    fall+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: føllini
    fall+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: føllini
    fall+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: føllunum
    fall+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: fallanna
